California statutes. Civil Code
(1) “Convicted felon” means any person convicted of a felony, or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a felony committed in California, either by a court or jury trial or by entry of a plea in court.

(2) “Felony” means a felony defined by any California or United States statute.

(3) (A) “Representative of the felon” means any person or entity receiving proceeds or profits by designation of that felon, on behalf of that felon, or in the stead of that felon, whether by the felon’s designation or by operation of law.

(B) “Profiteer of the felony” means any person who sells or transfers for profit any memorabilia or other property or thing of the felon, the value of which is enhanced by the notoriety gained from the commission of the felony for which the felon was convicted. This subparagraph shall not apply to any media entity reporting on the felon’s story or on the sale of the materials, memorabilia, or other property or thing of the felon. Nor shall it apply to the sale of the materials, as the term is defined in paragraph (6), where the seller is exercising his or her first amendment rights. This subparagraph also shall not apply to the sale or transfer by a profiteer of any other expressive work protected by
 the First Amendment unless the sale or transfer is primarily for a commercial or speculative purpose.

(4) (A) “Beneficiary” means a person who, under applicable law, other than the provisions of this section, has or had a right to recover damages from the convicted felon for physical, mental, or emotional injury, or pecuniary loss proximately caused by the convicted felon as a result of the crime for which the felon was convicted.

(B) If a beneficiary described in subparagraph (A) has died, “beneficiary” also includes a person or estate entitled to recover damages pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 377.10) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(C) If a person has died and the death was proximately caused by the convicted felon as a result of the crime for which the
 felon was convicted, “beneficiary” also includes a person described in Section 377.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure and any beneficiary of a will of the decedent who had a right under that will to receive more than 25 percent of the value of the estate of the decedent.

(5) “Beneficiary’s interest” means that portion of the proceeds or profits necessary to pay the following:

(A) In the case of a beneficiary described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (4), those damages that, under applicable law, other than the provisions of this section, the beneficiary has or had a right to recover from the convicted felon for injuries proximately caused by the convicted felon as a result of the crime for which the felon was convicted.

(B) In the case of a beneficiary described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), those
 damages that, under all the circumstances of the case, may be just.

(C) A beneficiary’s interest shall be reduced by the following amount:

(i) Money paid to the beneficiary from the Restitution Fund because of the crime for which the felon was convicted.

(ii) Money paid to the beneficiary by the convicted felon because of a requirement of restitution imposed by a court in connection with the crime for which the felon was convicted.

(iii) Money paid to the beneficiary because of a judgment against the convicted felon based upon the crime for which the felon was convicted.

(D) In the case of an unsatisfied existing judgment or order of restitution against the convicted felon and in favor of
 a beneficiary, any money paid to the beneficiary pursuant to this section shall be applied to reduce the amount of the unsatisfied judgment or order.

(6) “Materials” means books, magazine or newspaper articles, movies, films, videotapes, sound recordings, interviews or appearances on television and radio stations, and live presentations of any kind.

(7) “Story” means a depiction, portrayal, or reenactment of a felony and shall not be taken to mean a passing mention of the felony, as in a footnote or bibliography.

(8) “Sale” includes lease, license, or any other transfer or alienation taking place in California or elsewhere.

(9) “Proceeds” means all fees, royalties, real property, or other consideration of any and every kind or nature received by or
 owing to a felon or his or her representatives for the preparation for the purpose of sale of materials, for the sale of the rights to materials, or the sale or distribution by the convicted felon of materials whether earned, accrued, or paid before or after the conviction. It includes any interest, earnings, or accretions upon proceeds, and any property received in exchange for proceeds.

(10) “Profits” means all income from anything sold or transferred by the felon, a representative of the felon, or a profiteer of the felony, including any right, the value of which thing or right is enhanced by the notoriety gained from the commission of a felony for which a convicted felon was convicted. This income may have been accrued, earned, or paid before or after the conviction. However, voluntary donations or contributions to a defendant to assist in the defense of criminal charges shall not be deemed to be “profits,” provided the donation or
 contribution to that defense is not given in exchange for some material of value.

(b) (1) All proceeds from the preparation for the purpose of sale, the sale of the rights to, or the sale of materials that include or are based on the story of a felony for which a convicted felon was convicted, shall be subject to an involuntary trust for the benefit of the beneficiaries set forth in this section. That trust shall continue until five years after the time of payment of the proceeds to the felon or five years after the date of conviction, whichever is later. If an action is filed by a beneficiary to recover his or her interest in a trust within those time limitations, the trust character of the property shall continue until the conclusion of the action. At the end of the five-year trust period, any proceeds that remain in trust that have not been claimed by a beneficiary shall be transferred to the Controller, to be allocated
 to the Restitution Fund for the payment of claims pursuant to Section 13969 of the Government Code.

(2) All profits shall be subject to an involuntary trust for the benefit of the beneficiaries set forth in this section. That trust shall continue until five years after the time of payment of the profits to the felon or five years after the date of conviction, whichever is later. If an action is filed by a beneficiary to recover his or her interest in a trust within those time limitations, the trust character of the property shall continue until the conclusion of the action. At the end of the five-year trust period, any profits that remain in trust that have not been claimed by a beneficiary shall be transferred to the Controller, to be allocated to the Restitution Fund for the payment of claims pursuant to Section 13969 of the Government Code.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), in
 the case of a sale or transfer by a profiteer of the felony, the court in an action under subdivision (c) shall, upon an adequate showing by the profiteer of the felony, exclude from the involuntary trust that portion of the profits that represents the inherent value of the memorabilia, property, or thing sold or transferred and exclusive of the amount of the enhancement to the value due to the notoriety of the convicted felon.

(c) (1) Any beneficiary may bring an action against a convicted felon, representative of the felon, or a profiteer of a felony to recover his or her interest in the trust established by this section.

(2) That action may be brought in the superior court of the county in which the beneficiary resides, or of the county in which the convicted felon resides, or of the county in which proceeds or profits are located.

(3) If the court determines that a beneficiary is entitled to proceeds or profits pursuant to this section, the court shall order the payment from proceeds or profits that have been received, and, if that is insufficient, from proceeds or profits that may be received in the future.

(d) If there are two or more beneficiaries and if the available proceeds or profits are insufficient to pay all beneficiaries, the proceeds or profits shall be equitably apportioned among the beneficiaries taking into account the impact of the crime upon them.

Prior to any distribution of any proceeds to a beneficiary, the court shall determine whether the convicted felon has failed to pay any portion of a restitution fine or penalty fine imposed by a court, or any restitution imposed as a condition of probation. The court shall also determine whether the felon is
 obligated to reimburse a governmental entity for the costs of his or her defense and whether a portion of the proceeds is needed to cover his or her reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in the criminal proceeding related to the felony, or any appeal or other related proceeding, or in the defense of the action brought under this section. The court shall order payment of these obligations prior to any payment to a beneficiary, except that 60 percent of the proceeds or profits shall be reserved for payment to the beneficiaries.

(e) (1) The Attorney General may bring an action to require proceeds or profits received by a convicted felon to be held in an express trust in a bank authorized to act as a trustee.

(2) An action may be brought under this subdivision within one year after the receipt of proceeds or profits by a convicted felon or one year after the date
 of conviction, whichever is later.

That action may be brought in the superior court of any county in which the Attorney General has an office.

(3) If the Attorney General proves that the proceeds or profits are proceeds or profits from the sale of a story or thing of value that are subject to an involuntary trust pursuant to this section, and that it is more probable than not that there are beneficiaries within the meaning of this section, the court shall order that all proceeds or profits be deposited in a bank and held by the bank as trustee of the trust until an order of disposition is made by a court pursuant to subdivision (d), or until the expiration of the period specified in subdivision (b).

(4) If the Attorney General prevails in an action under this subdivision, the court shall order the payment from the proceeds or profits to
 the Attorney General of reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.

(f) (1) In any action brought pursuant to this section, upon motion of a party the court shall grant a preliminary injunction to prevent any waste of proceeds or profits if it appears that the proceeds or profits are subject to the provisions of this section, and that they may be subject to waste.

(2) Upon motion of the Attorney General or any potential beneficiary, the court shall grant a preliminary injunction against a person against whom an indictment or information for a felony has been filed in superior court to prevent any waste of proceeds or profits if there is probable cause to believe that the proceeds or profits would be subject to an involuntary trust pursuant to this section upon conviction of this person, and that they may be subject to waste.

(g) Any violation of an order of a court made pursuant to this section shall be punishable as contempt.

(h) The remedies provided by this section are in addition to other remedies provided by law.

No period of limitations, except those provided by this section, shall limit the right of recovery under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 9. AGENCY [2295. - 2400.]



  CHAPTER 1. Agency in General [2295. - 2357.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition of Agency [2295. - 2300.]

2295.

An agent is one who represents another, called the principal, in dealings with third persons. Such representation is called agency.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2296.

Any person having capacity to contract may appoint an agent, and any person may be an agent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2297.

An agent for a particular act or transaction is called a special agent. All others are general agents.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2298.

An agency is either actual or ostensible.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2299.

An agency is actual when the agent is really employed by the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2300.

An agency is ostensible when the principal intentionally, or by want of ordinary care, causes a third person to believe another to be his agent who is not really employed by him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Authority of Agents [2304. - 2326.]

2304.

An agent may be authorized to do any acts which his principal might do, except those to which the latter is bound to give his personal attention.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2305.

Every act which, according to this Code, may be done by or to any person, may be done by or to the agent of such person for that purpose, unless a contrary intention clearly appears.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2306.

An agent can never have authority, either actual or ostensible, to do an act which is, and is known or suspected by the person with whom he deals, to be a fraud upon the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2307.

An agency may be created, and an authority may be conferred, by a precedent authorization or a subsequent ratification.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2308.

A consideration is not necessary to make an authority, whether precedent or subsequent, binding upon the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2309.

An oral authorization is sufficient for any purpose, except that an authority to enter into a contract required by law to be in writing can only be given by an instrument in writing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2310.

A ratification can be made only in the manner that would have been necessary to confer an original authority for the act ratified, or where an oral authorization would suffice, by accepting or retaining the benefit of the act, with notice thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2311.

Ratification of part of an indivisible transaction is a ratification of the whole.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2312.

A ratification is not valid unless, at the time of ratifying the act done, the principal has power to confer authority for such an act.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2313.

No unauthorized act can be made valid, retroactively, to the prejudice of third persons, without their consent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2314.

A ratification may be rescinded when made without such consent as is required in a contract, or with an imperfect knowledge of the material facts of the transaction ratified, but not otherwise.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2315.

An agent has such authority as the principal, actually or ostensibly, confers upon him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2316.

Actual authority is such as a principal intentionally confers upon the agent, or intentionally, or by want of ordinary care, allows the agent to believe himself to possess.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2317.

Ostensible authority is such as a principal, intentionally or by want of ordinary care, causes or allows a third person to believe the agent to possess.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2318.

Every agent has actually such authority as is defined by this Title, unless specially deprived thereof by his principal, and has even then such authority ostensibly, except as to persons who have actual or constructive notice of the restriction upon his authority.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2319.

An agent has authority:

1. To do everything necessary or proper and usual, in the ordinary course of business, for effecting the purpose of his agency; and,

2. To make a representation respecting any matter of fact, not including the terms of his authority, but upon which his right to use his authority depends, and the truth of which cannot be determined by the use of reasonable diligence on the part of the person to whom the representation is made.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2320.

An agent has power to disobey instructions in dealing with the subject of the agency, in cases where it is clearly for the interest of his principal that he should do so, and there is not time to communicate with the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2321.

When an authority is given partly in general and partly in specific terms, the general authority gives no higher powers than those specifically mentioned.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2322.

An authority expressed in general terms, however broad, does not authorize an agent to do any of the following:

(a) Act in the agent’s own name, unless it is the usual course of business to do so.

(b) Define the scope of the agency.

(c) Violate a duty to which a trustee is subject under Section 16002, 16004, 16005, or 16009 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 113, Sec. 5.   Effective May 25, 1988.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

2323.

An authority to sell personal property includes authority to warrant the title of the principal, and the quality and quantity of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2324.

An authority to sell and convey real property includes authority to give the usual convenants of warranty.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2325.

A general agent to sell, who is intrusted by the principal with the possession of the thing sold, has authority to receive the price.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2326.

A special agent to sell has authority to receive the price on delivery of the thing sold, but not afterwards.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Mutual Obligations of Principals and Third Persons [2330. - 2339.]

2330.

An agent represents his principal for all purposes within the scope of his actual or ostensible authority, and all the rights and liabilities which would accrue to the agent from transactions within such limit, if they had been entered into on his own account, accrue to the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2331.

A principal is bound by an incomplete execution of an authority, when it is consistent with the whole purpose and scope thereof, but not otherwise.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2332.

As against a principal, both principal and agent are deemed to have notice of whatever either has notice of, and ought, in good faith and the exercise of ordinary care and diligence, to communicate to the other.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2333.

When an agent exceeds his authority, his principal is bound by his authorized acts so far only as they can be plainly separated from those which are unauthorized.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2334.

A principal is bound by acts of his agent, under a merely ostensible authority, to those persons only who have in good faith, and without want of ordinary care, incurred a liability or parted with value, upon the faith thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

2335.

If exclusive credit is given to an agent by the person dealing with him, his principal is exonerated by payment or other satisfaction made by him to his agent in good faith, before receiving notice of the creditor’s election to hold him responsible.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2336.

One who deals with an agent without knowing or having reason to believe that the agent acts as such in the transaction, may set off against any claim of the principal arising out of the same, all claims which he might have set off against the agent before notice of the agency.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2337.

An instrument within the scope of his authority by which an agent intends to bind his principal, does bind him if such intent is plainly inferable from the instrument itself.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2338.

Unless required by or under the authority of law to employ that particular agent, a principal is responsible to third persons for the negligence of his agent in the transaction of the business of the agency, including wrongful acts committed by such agent in and as a part of the transaction of such business, and for his willful omission to fulfill the obligations of the principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2339.

A principal is responsible for no other wrongs committed by his agent than those mentioned in the last section, unless he has authorized or ratified them, even though they are committed while the agent is engaged in his service.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Obligations of Agents to Third Persons [2342. - 2345.]

2342.

One who assumes to act as an agent thereby warrants, to all who deal with him in that capacity, that he has the authority which he assumes.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2343.

One who assumes to act as an agent is responsible to third persons as a principal for his acts in the course of his agency, in any of the following cases, and in no others:

1. When, with his consent, credit is given to him personally in a transaction; 

2. When he enters into a written contract in the name of his principal, without believing, in good faith, that he has authority to do so; or,

3. When his acts are wrongful in their nature.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2344.

If an agent receives anything for the benefit of his principal, to the possession of which another person is entitled, he must, on demand, surrender it to such person, or so much of it as he has under his control at the time of demand, on being indemnified for any advance which he has made to his principal, in good faith, on account of the same; and is responsible therefor, if, after notice from the owner, he delivers it to his principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2345.

The provisions of this Article are subject to the provisions of Part I, Division First, of this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Delegation of Agency [2349. - 2351.]

2349.

An agent, unless specially forbidden by his principal to do so, can delegate his powers to another person in any of the following cases, and in no others:

1. When the act to be done is purely mechanical;

2. When it is such as the agent cannot himself, and the sub-agent can lawfully perform;

3. When it is the usage of the place to delegate such powers; or,

4. When such delegation is specially authorized by the
 principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2350.

If an agent employs a sub-agent without authority, the former is a principal and the latter his agent, and the principal of the former has no connection with the latter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.

A sub-agent, lawfully appointed, represents the principal in like manner with the original agent; and the original agent is not responsible to third persons for the acts of the sub-agent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Termination of Agency [2355. - 2357.]

2355.

An agency is terminated, as to every person having notice thereof, by any of the following:

(a) The expiration of its term.

(b) The extinction of its subject.

(c) The death of the agent.

(d) The agent’s renunciation of the agency.

(e) The
 incapacity of the agent to act as such.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2356.

(a) Unless the power of an agent is coupled with an interest in the subject of the agency, it is terminated by any of the following:

(1) Its revocation by the principal.

(2) The death of the principal.

(3) The incapacity of the principal to contract.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (a), any bona fide transaction entered into with an agent by any person acting without actual knowledge of the revocation, death, or incapacity shall be binding upon the principal, his or her heirs, devisees, legatees, and other successors in interest.

(c) Nothing in this section shall affect the provisions of Section 1216.

(d) With respect to a proxy given by a person to another person relating to the exercise of voting rights, to the extent the provisions of this section conflict with or contravene any other provisions of the statutes of California pertaining to the proxy, the latter provisions shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2357.

For the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 2356, in the case of a principal who is an absentee as defined in Section 1403 of the Probate Code, a person shall be deemed to be without actual knowledge of:

(a) The principal’s death or incapacity while the absentee continues in missing status and until the person receives notice of the determination of the death of the absentee by the secretary concerned or the head of the department or agency concerned or the delegate of the secretary or
 head.

(b) Revocation by the principal during the period described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Particular Agencies [2362. - 2400.]



  ARTICLE 1. Auctioneers [2362. - 2363.]

2362.

An auctioneer, in the absence of special authorization or usage to the contrary, has authority from the seller, only as follows:

1. To sell by public auction to the highest bidder;

2. To sell for cash only, except such articles as are usually sold on credit at auction;

3. To warrant, in like manner with other agents to sell, according to Section 2323;

4. To prescribe reasonable rules and terms of sale;

5. To deliver the thing sold, upon payment of the price;

6. To collect the price; and,

7. To do whatever else is necessary, or proper and usual, in the ordinary course of business, for effecting these purposes.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2363.

An auctioneer has authority from a bidder at the auction, as well as from the seller, to bind both by a memorandum of the contract, as prescribed in the Title on Sale.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Factors [2367. - 2369.]

2367.

A factor is an agent, as defined by Section 2026.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2368.

In addition to the authority of agents in general, a factor has actual authority from his principal, unless specially restricted:

1. To insure property consigned to him uninsured;

2. To sell, on credit, anything intrusted to him for sale, except such things as it is contrary to usage to sell on credit; but not to pledge, mortgage, or barter the same; and,

3. To delegate his authority to his partner or servant, but not to any person in an independent employment.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2369.

A factor has ostensible authority to deal with the property of his principal as his own, in transactions with persons not having notice of the actual ownership.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers of Attorney Under Probate Code [2400. - 2400.]

2400.

Powers of attorney are governed by the Power of Attorney Law (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code) to the extent provided in that law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 10. RECORDING ARTIST CONTRACTS [2500. - 2501.]

2500.

As used in this title:

(a) “Royalty recipient” means a party to a contract for the furnishing of services in the production of sound recordings, as defined in Section 101 of Title 17 of the United States Code, who has the right to receive royalties under that contract.

(b) A “royalty reporting party” is the party obligated to pay royalties to the royalty recipient under the contract described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

Notwithstanding any provision of a contract described in Section 2500:

(a) A royalty recipient may audit the books and records of the royalty reporting party to determine if the royalty recipient earned all of the royalties due the royalty recipient pursuant to the contract, subject to the following:

(1) A royalty recipient may conduct an audit not more than once per year.

(2) A royalty recipient shall request an audit within three years after the end of a royalty earnings period under the contract.

(3) A royalty recipient may not audit a particular royalty earnings period more than once.

(b) The royalty recipient shall retain a qualified royalty auditor of the royalty recipient’s choice to conduct an audit described in this section.

(c) The royalty recipient may enter into a contingency fee agreement with the auditor described in subdivision (b).

(d) A qualified royalty auditor may conduct individual audits of the books and records of a royalty reporting party on behalf of different royalty recipients simultaneously.

(e) Except as required by
 law, a qualified royalty auditor shall not disclose any confidential information obtained solely during an audit without the express consent of the party or parties to whom that information is confidential. This subdivision shall not prohibit the auditor from disclosing to the royalty recipient, or an agent of the recipient, on behalf of whom the auditor is conducting the audit information directly pertaining to that royalty recipient’s contract, as described in Section 2500.

(f) The provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) are in addition to any other rights provided by a contract, as described in Section 2500, between a royalty recipient and a royalty reporting party.

(g) Nothing in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) shall be deemed to extend any limitations period applicable to royalty accounting or payments not specifically addressed in this section.

(h) Nothing in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) shall be deemed to limit any rights provided by collective bargaining agreement or by applicable state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 10.1. Shared Mobility Devices [2505. - 2506.]

2505.

(a) For purposes of this title:

(1) “Assistive technology device” has the same meaning as in Section 7002 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Shared mobility device” means an electrically motorized board as defined in Section 313.5 of the Vehicle Code, motorized scooter as defined in Section 407.5 of the Vehicle Code, electric bicycle as defined in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code, bicycle as defined in Section 231 of the Vehicle Code, or other similar personal transportation device, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 415 of the Vehicle Code, that is made available to the public by a shared mobility
 service provider for shared use and transportation in exchange for financial compensation via a digital application or other electronic or digital platform.

(3) “Shared mobility service provider” or “provider” means a person or entity that offers, makes available, or provides a shared mobility device in exchange for financial compensation or membership via a digital application or other electronic or digital platform.

(b) (1) Before distribution of a shared mobility device, a shared mobility service provider shall enter into an
 agreement with, or obtain a permit from, the city or county with jurisdiction over the area of use. The agreement or permit shall, at a minimum, require
 that the shared mobility service provider maintain commercial general liability insurance coverage with an admitted insurer, or a nonadmitted insurer that is eligible to insure a home state insured under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, with limits not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each occurrence for bodily injury or property damage, including contractual liability, personal injury, and product liability and completed operations, and not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) aggregate for all occurrences during the policy period. The insurance shall not exclude coverage for injuries or damages caused by the shared mobility service provider to the shared mobility device user.

(2) (A) (i) (I) Notwithstanding any other law, effective July 1, 2023, the agreement or permit required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall require, in addition to the coverage required by paragraph (1), a shared mobility service provider to offer or make available, or to confirm the user of a shared mobility device maintains, insurance coverage for bodily injury or death suffered by a pedestrian when the injury or death involves, in whole or in part, the negligent conduct of the shared mobility device user, of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each occurrence of bodily injury to, or death of, one pedestrian in any one accident, and for property damage to an assistive technology device, of one thousand dollars ($1,000), for each occurrence. This paragraph shall not be interpreted to require coverage as provided in Division 7 (commencing with Section
 16000) of the Vehicle Code.

(II) This clause shall not be interpreted to limit or supersede the requirement pursuant to paragraph (1) that the shared mobility service provider, in its agreement with or permit from the city or county with jurisdiction over the area of use, maintain commercial general liability insurance coverage with limits not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) aggregate for all occurrences during the policy period.

(III) This clause shall not be interpreted to prohibit an aggregated cap on the insurance required by subclause (I).

(IV) Insurance coverage offered, made available, or confirmed pursuant to this clause shall not be considered a group insurance policy.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i) or any other law, a shared mobility service provider or user of a shared mobility device is not required to maintain insurance coverage, as described in clause (i), for injuries of, or death to, a pedestrian or property damage involving the following devices:

(I) A bicycle propelled exclusively by human power, as described in Section 231 of the Vehicle Code. For purposes of this paragraph,
 “bicycle” shall not include an electric bicycle.

(II) A class 1 electric bicycle as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(III) A class 2 electric bicycle as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(iii) The Legislature finds and declares that bicycles may be recognized as safer than motorized devices when in use, and recognizes there may remain a propensity for pedestrian injuries or death resulting from shared mobility bicycles and shared mobility electric bicycles being left negligently abandoned on pedestrian walkways.

(B) A shared mobility service provider may partner
 with an insurer to provide an option to its users via its digital application or other electronic platform where the user may purchase insurance coverage that meets or exceeds the requirements of subparagraph (A). The shared mobility service provider shall disclose via its digital application or other electronic platform the name, contact information, and location to make a claim with the insurer they chose to partner with. The shared mobility service provider may fund the cost of providing this coverage itself and pass the cost on in its standard fee to users, or through a separate charge to users. If a user of a shared mobility device does not maintain their own insurance policy, then that coverage shall be offered or made available by the shared mobility service provider. A shared mobility service provider shall not allow a user or individual to operate or utilize a shared mobility device without the
 coverage identified in subparagraph (A). If a user or individual gains access to a shared mobility device without obtaining coverage through the options outlined in this subparagraph or subparagraph (C), and uses or operates it uninsured, the shared mobility service provider shall be required to provide the insurance coverage identified in subparagraph (A).

(C) (i) A shared mobility service provider may enter into separate individual agreements with users maintaining their own liability insurance coverage that meets or exceeds the requirements of subparagraph (A), to exclude the user from the provider’s insurance coverage required in subparagraph (A) when, in consideration for such an agreement, the user shall not pay a separate charge for the coverage or shall be refunded the portion of the provider’s fee that
 pays for the provider’s coverage. The agreement shall be null and void upon lapse, cancellation, or expiration of the user’s policy. If a shared mobility device user entering into an agreement under this subparagraph misrepresents their maintenance of a policy or through an error or act of omission does not provide coverage, the shared mobility service provider shall be required to maintain the insurance to cover any claims resulting in injury, death, or property damage described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in enacting this subparagraph, shared mobility service providers have the flexibility to offer or make available insurance options to their users, while also ensuring the shared mobility service providers’ insurance serves as the backstop to cover any pedestrian injuries or death, or
 property damage, should there be any unintended gaps in coverage as a result of users misrepresenting or not maintaining the insurance.
